Louisiana, session 2026, HB18.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 11:1651(C) and (D) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
11:1651(E) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1651. Board of trustees; membership; elections; vacancies; compensation
* * *
C.(1) The terms of the trustee serving as the retired assistant district attorney
and the trustee assigned to Division B as of January 1, 2026, shall expire on
August 14, 2027, and their successors shall be elected for a term of five years
commencing August 15, 2027.
(2) The terms of the trustees assigned to Division C and Division D as of
January 1, 2026, shall expire on August 14, 2029, and their successors shall be
elected for a term of five years, commencing on August 15, 2029.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 18 ENROLLED
(3) The terms of the trustees assigned to Division A and Division E as of
January 1, 2026, shall expire on August 14, 2030, and their successors shall be
elected for a term of five years, commencing on August 15, 2030.
(4) The terms of the trustee serving as the retired district attorney and the
trustee assigned to Division F as of January 1, 2026, shall expire on August 14, 2031,
and their successors shall be elected for a term of five years, commencing on
August 15, 2031.
D.(1) If a vacancy occurs in the office of a trustee, the vacancy shall be filled
for the unexpired term in the same manner as the office was previously filled.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, if a
vacancy occurs in the office of an elected trustee and the unexpired term is less than
two years, the board shall fill the vacancy by appointment within ninety days, for the
remainder of the unexpired term.
D. E. The trustees shall receive for attendance at meetings of the board a per
diem of seventy-five dollars per day plus the normal expense allowance allowed state
employees by the division of administration, provided funds are available for this
purpose.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.